Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.155

Deferred prosecution program for domestic violence behavior—Requirements. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

A deferred prosecution program for domestic violence behavior, or domestic violence co-occurring with substance abuse or mental health, must include, but is not limited to, the following requirements:

(1) Completion of a risk assessment;

(2) Participation in the level of treatment recommended by the program as outlined in the current treatment plan;

(3) Compliance with the contract for treatment;

(4) Participation in any ancillary or co-occurring treatments that are determined to be necessary for the successful completion of the domestic violence intervention treatment including, but not limited to, mental health or substance use treatment;

(5) Domestic violence intervention treatment within the purview of this section to be completed with a state-certified domestic violence intervention treatment program;

(6) Signature of the petitioner agreeing to the terms and conditions of the treatment program;

(7) Proof of compliance with any active order to surrender weapons issued in this program or related civil protection orders or no-contact orders.

[ 2019 c 263 s 708.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 263 ss 202-803: See note following RCW 10.01.240.

Effective date—2019 c 263 ss 501-504, 601, 602, and 701-708: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

PDFRCW 10.05.155

Deferred prosecution for domestic violence behavior—Requirements. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

A deferred prosecution for domestic violence behavior, or domestic violence co-occurring with substance abuse or mental health, must include, but is not limited to, the following requirements:

(1) Completion of a risk assessment;

(2) Participation in the level of treatment recommended by the program as outlined in the current treatment plan;

(3) Compliance with the contract for treatment;

(4) Participation in any ancillary or co-occurring treatments that are determined to be necessary for the successful completion of the domestic violence intervention treatment including, but not limited to, mental health or substance use treatment;

(5) Domestic violence intervention treatment within the purview of this section to be completed with a state-certified domestic violence intervention treatment program;

(6) Signature of the petitioner agreeing to the terms and conditions of the treatment program;

(7) Proof of compliance with any active order to surrender weapons issued in this program or related civil protection orders or no-contact orders.

[ 2024 c 306 s 23; 2019 c 263 s 708.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 306: See note following RCW 9.94A.661.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 263 ss 202-803: See note following RCW 10.01.240.

Effective date—2019 c 263 ss 501-504, 601, 602, and 701-708: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.